South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 15, Chapter 31, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-31-1610. Notwithstanding another provision of law, property within any municipality or county is exempt from any requirements to connect to any water or sewer systems if the system lacks the capacity to extend water and sewer systems to that property. Section 5-31-1620. Notwithstanding another provision of law, if a property owner within any municipality or county limits can show that governing body that it is more economical for the property owner to install a well or septic tank rather than connecting to any water and sewer systems, the property owner is exempt from any requirements to connect that water or sewer system. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----